District of Columbia statutes.
50-2421.06

Post-removal disposition of certain vehicles without further notice.

Except for vehicles removed after traffic accidents, the Department may, without further notice, dispose of a dangerous vehicle or abandoned vehicle removed from the public space or private property pursuant to any District law or regulation if the vehicle does not display a valid vehicle identification number and recognizable registration.

History

Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-35, § 6, 50 DCR 6579

Section References

This section is referenced in § 50-2201.03 and § 50-2421.07.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 6 of Removal and Disposition of Abandoned and Other Unlawfully Parked Vehicles Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-171, October 6, 2003, 50 DCR 9163).